Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5203
Residency programs; funding; use of funds.

The Legislature shall provide funding for residency programs as provided in sections 71-5201 to 71-5209. Such funding shall be in addition to all other funding of the University of Nebraska, including current sources of funding house officer education and training. The funding for the residency programs shall not be used to supplant funds for other programs under the administration of the College of Medicine or the University of Nebraska Medical Center.

Residency program funding shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Stipends for the residents in training;

(2) Salaries of appropriate faculty and auxiliary support personnel and operational budget items; and

(3) Initial construction costs and costs to remodel existing facilities to serve as model ambulatory practice units within a residency program.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 152, § 2.